California statutes. Probate Code
(6) Issue any order necessary to ensure the appearance in the proceeding of a person whose presence is necessary for the court to make a determination, including the conservatee or the proposed conservatee.

(7) Issue an order authorizing the release of medical, financial, criminal, or other relevant information in that state, including protected health information as defined in Section 160.103 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) If a court of another state in which a conservatorship proceeding
 is pending requests assistance of the kind provided in subdivision (a), a court of this state has jurisdiction for the limited purpose of granting the request or making reasonable efforts to comply with the request.

(c) Travel and other necessary and reasonable expenses incurred under subdivisions (a) and (b) may be assessed against the parties according to the law of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 20.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1986.

(a) In a conservatorship proceeding, in addition to other procedures that may be available, testimony of a witness who is located in another state may be offered by deposition or other means allowable in this state for testimony taken in another state. The court on its own motion may order that the testimony of a witness be taken in another state and may prescribe the manner in which and the terms upon which the testimony is to be taken.

(b) In a conservatorship proceeding, a court in this state may permit a witness located in another state to be deposed or to testify by telephone or audiovisual or other electronic means. A court of this state shall cooperate with the court of the other state in
 designating an appropriate location for the deposition or testimony.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 20.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Jurisdiction [1991. - 1999.]

1991.

(a) In this article:

(1) “Emergency” means a circumstance that likely will result in substantial harm to a proposed conservatee’s health, safety, or welfare, and for which the appointment of a conservator of the person is necessary because no other person has authority and is willing to act on behalf of the proposed conservatee.

(2) “Home state” means the state in which the proposed conservatee was physically present, including any period of temporary absence, for at least six consecutive months immediately before the filing of a petition for a conservatorship order, or, if none, the state in which the proposed conservatee was physically
 present, including any period of temporary absence, for at least six consecutive months ending within the six months prior to the filing of the petition.

(3) “Significant-connection state” means a state, other than the home state, with which a proposed conservatee has a significant connection other than mere physical presence and in which substantial evidence concerning the proposed conservatee is available.

(b) In determining under Section 1993 and subdivision (e) of Section 2001 whether a proposed conservatee has a significant connection with a particular state, the court shall consider all of the following:

(1) The location of the proposed conservatee’s family and other persons required to be notified of the conservatorship proceeding.

(2) The length
 of time the proposed conservatee at any time was physically present in the state and the duration of any absence.

(3) The location of the proposed conservatee’s property.

(4) The extent to which the proposed conservatee has ties to the state such as voting registration, state or local tax return filing, vehicle registration, driver’s license, social relationship, and receipt of services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 20.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1992.

For a conservatorship proceeding governed by this article, this article provides the exclusive basis for determining whether the courts of this state, as opposed to the courts of another state, have jurisdiction to appoint a conservator of the person, a conservator of the estate, or a conservator of the person and estate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 20.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1993.

(a) A court of this state has jurisdiction to appoint a conservator for a proposed conservatee if this state is the proposed conservatee’s home state.

(b) A court of this state has jurisdiction to appoint a conservator for a proposed conservatee if, on the date the petition is filed, this state is a significant-connection state and the proposed conservatee does not have a home state.

(c) A court of this state has jurisdiction to appoint a conservator for a proposed conservatee if, on the date the petition is filed, this state is a significant-connection state and a court of the proposed conservatee’s home state has expressly declined to exercise jurisdiction because this state is a more appropriate
 forum.

(d) A court of this state has jurisdiction to appoint a conservator for a proposed conservatee if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) On the date the petition is filed, this state is a significant-connection state, the proposed conservatee has a home state, and a conservatorship petition is not pending in a court of the home state or another significant-connection state.

(2) Before the court makes the appointment, no conservatorship petition is filed in the proposed conservatee’s home state, no objection to the court’s jurisdiction is filed by a person required to be notified of the proceeding, and the court in this state concludes that it is an appropriate forum under the factors set forth in Section 1996.

(e) A court of this
 state has jurisdiction to appoint a conservator for a proposed conservatee if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) This state does not have jurisdiction under subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d).

(2) The proposed conservatee’s home state and all significant-connection states have expressly declined to exercise jurisdiction because this state is the more appropriate forum.

(3) Jurisdiction in this state is consistent with the constitutions of this state and the United States.

(f) A court of this state has jurisdiction to appoint a conservator for a proposed conservatee if the requirements for special jurisdiction under Section 1994 are met.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 211.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1994.

(a) A court of this state lacking jurisdiction under subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, of Section 1993 has special jurisdiction to do any of the following:

(1) Appoint a temporary conservator of the person in an emergency for a proposed conservatee who is physically present in this state. In making an appointment under this paragraph, a court shall follow the procedures specified in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 2250) of Part 4. The temporary conservatorship shall terminate in accordance with Section 2257.

(2) Appoint a conservator of the estate with respect to real or tangible personal property located in this state.

(3) Appoint a conservator of the person, conservator of the estate, or conservator of the person and estate for a proposed conservatee for whom a provisional order to transfer a proceeding from another state has been issued under procedures similar to Section 2001. In making an appointment under this paragraph, a court shall follow the procedures specified in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 2250) of Part 4. The temporary conservatorship shall terminate in accordance with Section 2257.

(b) If a petition for the appointment of a conservator of the person in an emergency is brought in this state and this state was not the home state of the proposed conservatee on the date the petition was filed, the court shall dismiss the proceeding at the request of the court of the home state, if any, whether dismissal is requested before or after the emergency appointment of a temporary
 conservator of the person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 20.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1995.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 1994, a court that has appointed a conservator consistent with this chapter has exclusive and continuing jurisdiction over the proceeding until it is terminated by the court or the appointment expires by its own terms.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 20.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1996.

(a) (1) A court of this state having jurisdiction under Section 1993 to appoint a conservator may decline to exercise its jurisdiction if it determines at any time that a court of another state is a more appropriate forum.

(2) The issue of appropriate forum may be raised upon petition of any interested person, the court’s own motion, or the request of another court.

(3) The petitioner, or, if there is no petitioner, the court in this state, shall give notice of the petition, motion, or request to the same persons and in the same manner as for a petition for a conservatorship under Section 1801. The notice shall
 state the basis for the petition, motion, or request, and shall inform the recipients of the date, time, and place of the hearing under paragraph (4). The notice shall also advise the recipients that they have a right to object to the petition, motion, or request. The notice to the potential conservatee shall inform the potential conservatee of the right to be represented by legal counsel if the potential conservatee so chooses, and to have legal counsel appointed by the court if the potential conservatee is unable to retain legal counsel.

(4) The court shall hold a hearing on the petition, motion, or request.

(b) If a court of this state declines to exercise its jurisdiction under subdivision (a), it shall grant the petition, motion, or request, and either dismiss or stay any conservatorship proceeding pending in this state. The court’s order shall be based on evidence presented
 to the court. The order shall be in a record and shall expressly state that the court declines to exercise its jurisdiction because a court of another state is a more appropriate forum. The court may impose any condition the court considers just and proper, including the condition that a petition for the appointment of a conservator of the person, conservator of the estate, or conservator of the person and estate be filed promptly in another state.

(c) In determining whether it is an appropriate forum, the court shall consider all relevant factors, including all of the following:

(1) Any expressed preference of the proposed conservatee.

(2) Whether abuse, neglect, or exploitation of the proposed conservatee has occurred or is likely to occur and which state could best protect the proposed conservatee from the abuse,
 neglect, or exploitation.

(3) The length of time the proposed conservatee was physically present in or was a legal resident of this or another state.

(4) The location of the proposed conservatee’s family, friends, and other persons required to be notified of the conservatorship proceeding.

(5) The distance of the proposed conservatee from the court in each state.

(6) The financial circumstances of the estate of the proposed conservatee.

(7) The nature and location of the evidence.

(8) The ability of the court in each state to decide the issue expeditiously and the procedures necessary to present evidence.

(9) The familiarity of the court of each state with the facts and issues in the proceeding.

(10) If an appointment were made, the court’s ability to monitor the conduct of the conservator.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 20.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1997.

(a) If at any time a court of this state determines that it acquired jurisdiction to appoint a conservator because of unjustifiable conduct, the court may do any of the following:

(1) Decline to exercise jurisdiction.

(2) Exercise jurisdiction for the limited purpose of fashioning an appropriate remedy to ensure the health, safety, and welfare of the conservatee or proposed conservatee or the protection of the property of the conservatee or proposed conservatee or to prevent a repetition of the unjustifiable conduct, including staying the proceeding until a petition for the appointment of a conservator of the person, conservator of the
 estate, or conservator of the person and estate is filed in a court of another state having jurisdiction.

(3) Continue to exercise jurisdiction after considering all of the following:

(A) The extent to which the conservatee or proposed conservatee and all persons required to be notified of the proceedings have acquiesced in the exercise of the court’s jurisdiction.

(B) Whether it is a more appropriate forum than the court of any other state under the factors set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 1996.

(C) Whether the court of any other state would have jurisdiction under factual circumstances in substantial conformity with the jurisdictional standards of Section 1993.

(b) If a court of
 this state determines that it acquired jurisdiction to appoint a conservator because a party seeking to invoke its jurisdiction engaged in unjustifiable conduct, it may assess against that party necessary and reasonable expenses, including attorney’s fees, investigative fees, court costs, communication expenses, medical examination expenses, witness fees and expenses, and travel expenses. The court may not assess fees, costs, or expenses of any kind against this state or a governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality of this state unless authorized by law other than this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 20.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1998.

If a petition for the appointment of a conservator of the person, conservator of the estate, or conservator of the person and estate is brought in this state and this state was not the home state of the proposed conservatee on the date the petition was filed, in addition to complying with the notice requirements of this state, the petitioner shall give notice of the petition or of a hearing on the petition to those persons who would be entitled to notice of the petition or of a hearing on the petition if a proceeding were brought in the home state of the proposed conservatee. The notice shall be given in the same manner as notice is required to be given in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 20.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1999.

Except for a petition for the appointment of a conservator under paragraph (1) or paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1994, if a petition for the appointment of a conservator is filed in this state and in another state and neither petition has been dismissed or withdrawn, the following rules apply:

(a) If the court in this state has jurisdiction under Section 1993, it may proceed with the case unless a court in another state acquires jurisdiction under provisions similar to Section 1993 before the appointment.

(b) If the court in this state does not have jurisdiction under Section 1993, whether at the time the petition is filed or at any time before
 the appointment, the court shall stay the proceeding and communicate with the court in the other state. If the court in the other state has jurisdiction, the court in this state shall dismiss the petition unless the court in the other state determines that the court in this state is a more appropriate forum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 20.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Transfer of Conservatorship [2001. - 2003.]

2001.

(a) A conservator appointed in this state may petition the court to transfer the conservatorship to another state.

(b) The petitioner shall give notice of a hearing on a petition under subdivision (a) to the persons that would be entitled to notice of a hearing on a petition in this state for the appointment of a conservator.

(c) The court shall hold a hearing on a petition filed pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) The court shall issue an order provisionally granting a petition to transfer a conservatorship of the person, and shall direct the conservator of the person to
 petition for acceptance of the conservatorship in the other state, if the court is satisfied that the conservatorship will be accepted by the court in the other state and the court finds all of the following:

(1) The conservatee is physically present in or is reasonably expected to move permanently to the other state.

(2) An objection to the transfer has not been made or, if an objection has been made, the court determines that the transfer would not be contrary to the interests of the conservatee.

(3) Plans for care and services for the conservatee in the other state are reasonable and sufficient.

(e) The court shall issue a provisional order granting a petition to transfer a conservatorship of the estate, and shall direct the conservator of the estate
 to petition for acceptance of the conservatorship in the other state, if the court is satisfied that the conservatorship will be accepted by the court of the other state and the court finds all of the following:

(1) The conservatee is physically present in or is reasonably expected to move permanently to the other state, or the conservatee has a significant connection to the other state considering the factors in subdivision (b) of Section 1991.

(2) An objection to the transfer has not been made or, if an objection has been made, the court determines that the transfer would not be contrary to the interests of the conservatee.

(3) Adequate arrangements will be made for management of the conservatee’s property.

(f) The court shall issue a provisional
 order granting a petition to transfer a conservatorship of the person and estate, and shall direct the conservator to petition for acceptance of the conservatorship in the other state, if the requirements of subdivision (d) and the requirements of subdivision (e) are both satisfied.

(g) The court shall issue a final order confirming the transfer and terminating the conservatorship upon its receipt of both of the following:

(1) A provisional order accepting the proceeding from the court to which the proceeding is to be transferred which is issued under provisions similar to Section 2002.

(2) The documents required to terminate a conservatorship in this state, including, but not limited to, any required accounting.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 20.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

2002.

(a) (1) To confirm transfer of a conservatorship transferred to this state under provisions similar to Section 2001, the conservator shall petition the court in this state to accept the conservatorship.

(2) The petition shall include a certified copy of the other state’s provisional order of transfer.

(3) On the first page of the petition, the petitioner shall state that the conservatorship does not fall within the limitations of Section 1981. The body of the petition shall allege facts showing that this chapter applies and the requirements for transfer of the conservatorship are satisfied.

(4) The petition shall specify any modifications necessary to conform the conservatorship to the law of this state, and the terms of a proposed final order accepting the conservatorship.

(5) A petition for the appointment of a temporary conservator under Section 1994 and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 2250) of Part 4 may be filed while a petition under this section is pending. The petition for the appointment of a temporary conservator shall request the appointment of a temporary conservator eligible for appointment in this state, and shall be limited to powers authorized for a temporary conservator in this state. For purposes of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 2250) of Part 4, the court shall treat a petition under this section as the equivalent of a petition for a general conservatorship.

(b) The petitioner
 shall give notice of a hearing on a petition under subdivision (a) to those persons that would be entitled to notice if the petition were a petition for the appointment of a conservator in both the transferring state and this state. The petitioner shall also give notice to any attorney of record for the conservatee in the transferring state and to any attorney appointed or appearing for the conservatee in this state. The petitioner shall give the notice in the same manner that notice of a petition for the appointment of a conservator is required to be given in this state, except that notice to the conservatee shall be given by mailing the petition instead of by personal service of a citation.

(c) Any person entitled to notice under subdivision (b) may object to the petition on one or more of the following grounds:

(1) Transfer of the proceeding would be contrary to the interests
 of the conservatee.

(2) Under the law of the transferring state, the conservator is ineligible for appointment in this state.

(3) Under the law of this state, the conservator is ineligible for appointment in this state, and the transfer petition does not identify a replacement who is willing and eligible to serve in this state.

(4) This chapter is inapplicable under Section 1981.

(d) Promptly after the filing of a petition under subdivision (a), the court shall appoint an investigator under Section 1454. The investigator shall promptly commence a preliminary investigation of the conservatorship, which focuses on the matters described in subdivision (f).

(e) The court shall hold a hearing
 on a petition filed pursuant to subdivision (a).

(f) The court shall issue an order provisionally granting a petition filed under subdivision (a) unless any of the following occurs:

(1) The court determines that transfer of the proceeding would be contrary to the interests of the conservatee.

(2) The court determines that, under the law of the transferring state, the conservator is ineligible for appointment in this state.

(3) The court determines that, under the law of this state, the conservator is ineligible for appointment in this state, and the transfer petition does not identify a replacement who is willing and eligible to serve in this state.

(4) The court determines that this
 chapter is inapplicable under Section 1981.

(g) If the court issues an order provisionally granting the petition, the investigator shall promptly commence an investigation under Section 1851.1.

(h) (1) Not later than 60 days after issuance of an order provisionally granting the petition, the court shall determine whether the conservatorship needs to be modified to conform to the law of this state. The court may take any action necessary to achieve compliance with the law of this state, including, but not limited to, striking or modifying any conservator powers that are not permitted under the law of this state.

(2) At the same time that it makes the determination required by paragraph (1), the court shall review the conservatorship as provided in Section 1851.1.

(3) The conformity determination and the review required by this subdivision shall occur at a hearing, which shall be noticed as provided in subdivision (b).

(i) (1) The court shall issue a final order accepting the proceeding and appointing the conservator in this state upon completion of the conformity determination and review required by subdivision (h), or upon its receipt from the court from which the proceeding is being transferred of a final order issued under provisions similar to Section 2001 transferring the proceeding to this state, whichever occurs later. In appointing a conservator under this paragraph, the court shall comply with Section 1830.

(2) A transfer to this state does not become effective unless and until the court issues a final order under paragraph (1). A conservator may
 not take action in this state pursuant to a transfer petition unless and until the transfer becomes effective and all of the following steps have occurred:

(A) The conservator has taken an oath in accordance with Section 2300.

(B) The conservator has filed the required bond, if any.

(C) The court has provided the information required by Section 1835 to the conservator.

(D) The conservator has filed an acknowledgment of receipt as required by Section 1834.

(E) The clerk of the court has issued the letters of conservatorship.

(3) Paragraph (2) does not preclude a person who has been appointed as a temporary conservator pursuant
 to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 2250) from taking action in this state pursuant to the order establishing the temporary conservatorship.

(4) When a transfer to this state becomes effective, the conservatorship is subject to the law of this state and shall thereafter be treated as a conservatorship under the law of this state. If a law of this state, including, but not limited to, Section 2356.5, mandates compliance with special requirements to exercise a particular conservatorship power or take a particular step, the conservator of a transferred conservatorship may not exercise that power or take that step without first complying with those special requirements.

(j) Except as otherwise provided by Section 1851.1, Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1860), Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 2650) of Part 4, and other law, when the court grants a petition under this section,
 the court shall recognize a conservatorship order from the other state, including the determination of the conservatee’s incapacity and the appointment of the conservator.

(k) The denial by a court of this state of a petition to accept a conservatorship transferred from another state does not affect the ability of the conservator to seek appointment as conservator in this state under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1800) of Part 3 if the court has jurisdiction to make an appointment other than by reason of the provisional order of transfer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 20.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

2003.

If a conservatorship is transferred under this article from a court of this state to the court of a California tribe or from the court of a California tribe to a court of this state, the order that provisionally grants the transfer may expressly provide that specified powers of the conservator will not be transferred. Jurisdiction over the specified powers will be retained by the transferring state and will not be included in the powers that are granted to the conservator in the state that accepts the transfer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 20.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Registration and Recognition of Orders from Other States [2011. - 2019.]

2011.

If a conservator of the person has been appointed in another state and a petition for the appointment of a conservator of the person is not pending in this state, the conservator of the person appointed in the other state, after providing notice pursuant to Section 2014, may register the conservatorship order in this state by filing certified copies of the order and letters of office, and proof of notice as required herein, together with a cover sheet approved by the Judicial Council, in the superior court of any appropriate county of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 20.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

2012.

If a conservator of the estate has been appointed in another state and a petition for a conservatorship of the estate is not pending in this state, the conservator appointed in the other state, after providing notice pursuant to Section 2014, may register the conservatorship order in this state by filing certified copies of the order and letters of office and of any bond, and proof of notice as required herein, together with a cover sheet approved by the Judicial Council, in the superior court of any county of this state in which property belonging to the conservatee is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 20.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

2013.

If a conservator of the person and estate has been appointed in another state and a petition for a conservatorship of the person, conservatorship of the estate, or conservatorship of the person and estate is not pending in this state, the conservator appointed in the other state, after providing notice pursuant to Section 2014, may register the conservatorship order in this state by filing certified copies of the order and letters of office and of any bond, and proof of notice as required herein, together with a cover sheet approved by the Judicial Council, in the superior court of any appropriate county of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 20.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

2014.

(a) At least 15 days before registering a conservatorship in this state, the conservator shall provide notice of an intent to register to all of the following:

(1) The court supervising the conservatorship.

(2) Every person who would be entitled to notice of a petition for the appointment of a conservator in the state where the conservatorship is being supervised.

(3) Every person who would be entitled to notice of a petition for the appointment of a conservator in this state.

(b) Each notice provided pursuant
 to subdivision (a) shall comply with all of the following:

(1) The notice shall prominently state that when a conservator acts pursuant to this article, the conservator is subject to the law of this state governing the action, including, but not limited to, all applicable procedures, and is not authorized to take any action prohibited by the law of this state.

(2) The notice shall explain that if a conservatorship is registered pursuant to this article, and the conservator later proposes to take a specific action pursuant to this article, which, under the law of this state, requires court approval or other action in court, the conservator will be required to notify the recipient of the request for court approval or other court action, and the recipient will have an opportunity to object or otherwise participate at that time, in the same manner as other persons are entitled to
 object or otherwise participate under the law of this state.

(3) The notice shall advise the recipient that information about a conservator’s rights, duties, limitations, and responsibilities under the law of this state is available, free of charge, on an Internet Web site maintained by the Judicial Council. The notice shall explain specifically how to locate that information on the Judicial Council’s Internet Web site.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 2023, each notice provided pursuant to subdivision (a) shall also prominently state that the registration is effective only while the conservatee resides in another jurisdiction and does not authorize the conservator to take any action while the conservatee is residing in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 20.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

2015.

Upon registration of a conservatorship pursuant to this article, the court shall provide the conservator with written information concerning a conservator’s rights, duties, limitations, and responsibilities in this state, as specified in Section 1835. To cover the costs of providing that information, a court may charge the conservator the fee specified in Section 1835, which shall be distributed as specified in that section. The conservator shall file an acknowledgment of receipt of the written information, on a form prescribed by the Judicial Council.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 20.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

2016.

(a) Upon registration of a conservatorship order from another state and the filing by the conservator of an acknowledgment of receipt of the written information required by Section 2015, the conservator may, while the conservatee resides out of this state, exercise in any county of this state all powers authorized in the order of appointment except as prohibited under the laws of this state, including maintaining actions and proceedings in this state and, if the conservator is not a resident of this state, subject to any conditions imposed upon nonresident parties. When acting pursuant to registration, the conservator is subject to the law of this state governing the action, including, but not limited to, all applicable procedures, and is not authorized to take any
 action prohibited by the law of this state. If a law of this state, including, but not limited to, Section 2352, 2352.5, 2355, 2356.5, 2540, 2543, 2545, or 2591.5, or Article 2 (commencing with Section 1880) of Chapter 4 of Part 4, mandates compliance with special requirements to exercise a particular conservatorship power or take a particular step, the conservator of a registered conservatorship may not exercise that power or take that step without first complying with those special requirements.

(b) (1) When subdivision (a) requires a conservator to comply with a law of this state that makes it necessary to obtain court approval or take other action in court, the conservator shall seek that approval or proceed as needed in an appropriate court of this state. In handling the matter, that court shall communicate and cooperate with the court that is supervising the conservatorship, in accordance with Sections 1984 and
 1985.

(2) In addition to providing any other notice required by law, the conservator shall provide notice of a court proceeding under paragraph (1) to all of the following:

(A) The court supervising the conservatorship.

(B) Every person who would be entitled to notice of a petition for the appointment of a conservator in the state where the conservatorship is being supervised.

(C) Every person who would be entitled to notice of a petition for the appointment of a conservator in this state.

(3) Any person entitled to notice under paragraph (2) may raise an objection or otherwise participate in the proceeding in the same manner as other persons are allowed to do under the law of this
 state.

(c) Subdivision (a) applies only when the conservatee resides out of this state. When the conservatee resides in this state, a conservator may not exercise any powers pursuant to a registration under this article.

(d) A court of this state may grant any relief available under this chapter and other law of this state to enforce a registered order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 20.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

2017.

(a) A third person who acts in good faith reliance on a conservatorship order registered under this article is not liable to any person for so acting if all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) The conservator presents to the third person a file-stamped copy of the registration documents required by Section 2011, 2012, or 2013, including, but not limited to, the certified copy of the conservatorship order.

(2) Each of the registration documents, including, but not limited to, the conservatorship order and the file-stamped cover sheet, appears on its face to be valid.

(3) The conservator presents to the third person a form approved by the Judicial Council, in which the conservator attests that the conservatee does not reside in this state and the conservator promises to promptly notify the third person if the conservatee becomes a resident of this state. The form shall also prominently state that the registration is effective only while the conservatee resides in another jurisdiction and does not authorize the conservator to take any action while the conservatee is residing in this state.

(4) The third person has not received any actual notice that the conservatee is residing in this state.

(b) Nothing in this section is intended to create an implication that a third person is liable for acting in reliance on a conservatorship order registered under this article under circumstances where the requirements of subdivision (a) are not
 satisfied. Nothing in this section affects any immunity that may otherwise exist apart from this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 20.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

2018.

(a) A file-stamped copy of the registration documents required by Section 2011, 2012, or 2013 may be recorded in the office of any county recorder in this state.

(b) A county recorder may charge a reasonable fee for recordation under subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 20.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

2019.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article:

(a) A conservatorship order of a court of a California tribe can be registered under Section 2011, 2012, or 2013, regardless of whether the conservatee resides in California.

(b) The effect of a conservatorship order of a court of a California tribe that is registered under Section 2011, 2012, or 2013 is not contingent on whether the conservatee resides in California.

(c) Paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 2017 do not apply to a conservatorship order of a court of a California
 tribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 20.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Miscellaneous Provisions [2021. - 2024.]

2021.
